src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!  ----------------------
!! The Gunwinggu language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but perhaps with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON ProperNounCases
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
        -    Nouns  ; ! perhaps compounding

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
