src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
!! Propre nouns
!! Proper  nouns in the Gunwinggu language are names of things.

LEXICON ProperNouns
Propernoun+N:Propernoun    ProperNounCases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
